test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nouns2-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
    sõda+N+Sg+Abl: sõjalt
    sõda+N+Sg+Ade: sõjal
    sõda+N+Sg+All: sõjale
    sõda+N+Sg+Com: sõjaga
    sõda+N+Sg+Ela: sõjast
    sõda+N+Sg+Ess: sõjana
    sõda+N+Sg+Gen: sõja
    sõda+N+Sg+Ill: sõtta
    sõda+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: sõjasse
    sõda+N+Sg+Ine: sõjas
    sõda+N+Sg+Nom: sõda
    sõda+N+Sg+Par: sõda
    sõda+N+Sg+Tra: sõjaks
    sõda+N+Sg+Trm: sõjani
    süda+N+Pl+Abe: südameteta
    süda+N+Pl+Abl: südametelt
    süda+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: südameilt
    süda+N+Pl+Ade: südametel
    süda+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: südameil
    süda+N+Pl+All: südametele
    süda+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: südameile
    süda+N+Pl+Com: südametega
    süda+N+Pl+Ela: südametest
    süda+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: südameist
    süda+N+Pl+Ess: südametena
    süda+N+Pl+Gen: südamete
    süda+N+Pl+Ill: südametesse
    süda+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: südameisse
    süda+N+Pl+Ine: südametes
    süda+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: südameis
    süda+N+Pl+Nom: südamed
    süda+N+Pl+Par: südameid
    süda+N+Pl+Tra: südameteks
    süda+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: südameiks
    süda+N+Pl+Trm: südameteni
    süda+N+Sg+Abe: südameta
    süda+N+Sg+Abl: südamelt
    süda+N+Sg+Ade: südamel
    süda+N+Sg+All: südamele
    süda+N+Sg+Com: südamega
    süda+N+Sg+Ela: südamest
    süda+N+Sg+Ess: südamena
    süda+N+Sg+Gen: südame
    süda+N+Sg+Ill: südamesse
    süda+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: südame
    süda+N+Sg+Ine: südames
    süda+N+Sg+Nom: süda
    süda+N+Sg+Par: südant
    süda+N+Sg+Tra: südameks
    süda+N+Sg+Trm: südameni
    süsi+N+Pl+Abe: süteta
    süsi+N+Pl+Abl: sütelt
    süsi+N+Pl+Ade: sütel
    süsi+N+Pl+All: sütele
    süsi+N+Pl+Com: sütega
    süsi+N+Pl+Ela: sütest
    süsi+N+Pl+Ess: sütena
    süsi+N+Pl+Gen: süte
    süsi+N+Pl+Ill: sütesse
    süsi+N+Pl+Ine: sütes
    süsi+N+Pl+Nom: söed
    süsi+N+Pl+Par: süsi
    süsi+N+Pl+Tra: süteks
    süsi+N+Pl+Trm: süteni
    süsi+N+Sg+Abe: söeta
    süsi+N+Sg+Abl: söelt
    süsi+N+Sg+Ade: söel
    süsi+N+Sg+All: söele
    süsi+N+Sg+Com: söega
    süsi+N+Sg+Ela: söest
    süsi+N+Sg+Ess: söena
    süsi+N+Sg+Gen: söe
    süsi+N+Sg+Ill: söesse
    süsi+N+Sg+Ine: söes
    süsi+N+Sg+Nom: süsi
    süsi+N+Sg+Par: sütt
    süsi+N+Sg+Tra: söeks
    süsi+N+Sg+Trm: söeni
    tahe+N+Pl+Abe: taheteta
    tahe+N+Pl+Abl: tahetelt
    tahe+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: tahteilt
    tahe+N+Pl+Ade: tahetel
    tahe+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: tahteil
    tahe+N+Pl+All: tahetele
    tahe+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: tahteile
    tahe+N+Pl+Com: tahetega
    tahe+N+Pl+Ela: tahetest
    tahe+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: tahteist
    tahe+N+Pl+Ess: tahetena
    tahe+N+Pl+Gen: tahete
    tahe+N+Pl+Ill: tahetesse
    tahe+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: tahteisse
    tahe+N+Pl+Ine: tahetes
    tahe+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: tahteis
    tahe+N+Pl+Nom: tahted
    tahe+N+Pl+Par: tahteid
    tahe+N+Pl+Tra: taheteks
    tahe+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: tahteiks
    tahe+N+Pl+Trm: taheteni
    tahe+N+Sg+Abe: tahteta
    tahe+N+Sg+Abl: tahtelt
    tahe+N+Sg+Ade: tahtel
    tahe+N+Sg+All: tahtele
    tahe+N+Sg+Com: tahtega
    tahe+N+Sg+Ela: tahtest
    tahe+N+Sg+Ess: tahtena
    tahe+N+Sg+Gen: tahte
    tahe+N+Sg+Ill: tahtesse
    tahe+N+Sg+Ine: tahtes
    tahe+N+Sg+Nom: tahe
    tahe+N+Sg+Par: tahet
    tahe+N+Sg+Tra: tahteks
    tahe+N+Sg+Trm: tahteni
    talv+N+Pl+Abe: talvedeta
    talv+N+Pl+Abl: talvedelt
    talv+N+Pl+Ade: talvedel
    talv+N+Pl+All: talvedele
    talv+N+Pl+Com: talvedega
    talv+N+Pl+Ela: talvedest
    talv+N+Pl+Ess: talvedena
    talv+N+Pl+Gen: talvede
    talv+N+Pl+Ill: talvedesse
    talv+N+Pl+Ine: talvedes
    talv+N+Pl+Nom: talved
    talv+N+Pl+Par: talvesid
    talv+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: talvi
    talv+N+Pl+Tra: talvedeks
    talv+N+Pl+Trm: talvedeni
    talv+N+Sg+Abe: talveta
    talv+N+Sg+Abl: talvelt
    talv+N+Sg+Ade: talvel
    talv+N+Sg+All: talvele
    talv+N+Sg+Com: talvega
    talv+N+Sg+Ela: talvest
    talv+N+Sg+Ess: talvena
    talv+N+Sg+Gen: talve
    talv+N+Sg+Ill: talve
    talv+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: talvesse
    talv+N+Sg+Ine: talves
    talv+N+Sg+Nom: talv
    talv+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Rare: tali
    talv+N+Sg+Par: talve
    talv+N+Sg+Tra: talveks
    talv+N+Sg+Trm: talveni
    tanner+N+Pl+Abe: tandriteta
    tanner+N+Pl+Abl: tandritelt
    tanner+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: tandreilt
    tanner+N+Pl+Ade: tandritel
    tanner+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: tandreil
    tanner+N+Pl+All: tandritele
    tanner+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: tandreile
    tanner+N+Pl+Com: tandritega
    tanner+N+Pl+Ela: tandritest
    tanner+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: tandreist
    tanner+N+Pl+Ess: tandritena
    tanner+N+Pl+Gen: tandrite
    tanner+N+Pl+Ill: tandritesse
    tanner+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: tandreisse
    tanner+N+Pl+Ine: tandrites
    tanner+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: tandreis
    tanner+N+Pl+Nom: tandrid
    tanner+N+Pl+Par: tandreid
    tanner+N+Pl+Tra: tandriteks
    tanner+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: tandreiks
    tanner+N+Pl+Trm: tandriteni
    tanner+N+Sg+Abe: tandrita
    tanner+N+Sg+Abl: tandrilt
    tanner+N+Sg+Ade: tandril
    tanner+N+Sg+All: tandrile
    tanner+N+Sg+Com: tandriga
    tanner+N+Sg+Ela: tandrist
    tanner+N+Sg+Ess: tandrina
    tanner+N+Sg+Gen: tandri
    tanner+N+Sg+Ill: tandrisse
    tanner+N+Sg+Ine: tandris
    tanner+N+Sg+Nom: tanner
    tanner+N+Sg+Par: tandrit
    tanner+N+Sg+Tra: tandriks
    tanner+N+Sg+Trm: tandrini
    taud+N+Pl+Abe: taudideta
    taud+N+Pl+Abl: taudidelt
    taud+N+Pl+Ade: taudidel
    taud+N+Pl+All: taudidele
    taud+N+Pl+Com: taudidega
    taud+N+Pl+Ela: taudidest
    taud+N+Pl+Ess: taudidena
    taud+N+Pl+Gen: taudide
    taud+N+Pl+Ill: taudidesse
    taud+N+Pl+Ine: taudides
    taud+N+Pl+Nom: taudid
    taud+N+Pl+Par: taude
    taud+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: taudisid
    taud+N+Pl+Tra: taudideks
    taud+N+Pl+Trm: taudideni
    taud+N+Sg+Abe: taudita
    taud+N+Sg+Abl: taudilt
    taud+N+Sg+Ade: taudil
    taud+N+Sg+All: taudile
    taud+N+Sg+Com: taudiga
    taud+N+Sg+Ela: taudist
    taud+N+Sg+Ess: taudina
    taud+N+Sg+Gen: taudi
    taud+N+Sg+Ill: taudi
    taud+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: taudisse
    taud+N+Sg+Ine: taudis
    taud+N+Sg+Nom: taud
    taud+N+Sg+Par: taudi
    taud+N+Sg+Tra: taudiks
    taud+N+Sg+Trm: taudini
    teivas+N+Pl+Abe: teivasteta
    teivas+N+Pl+Abl: teivastelt
    teivas+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: teibailt
    teivas+N+Pl+Ade: teivastel
    teivas+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: teibail
    teivas+N+Pl+All: teivastele
    teivas+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: teibaile
    teivas+N+Pl+Com: teivastega
    teivas+N+Pl+Ela: teivastest
    teivas+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: teibaist
    teivas+N+Pl+Ess: teivastena
    teivas+N+Pl+Gen: teivaste
    teivas+N+Pl+Ill: teivastesse
    teivas+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: teibaisse
    teivas+N+Pl+Ine: teivastes
    teivas+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: teibais
    teivas+N+Pl+Nom: teibad
    teivas+N+Pl+Par: teibaid
    teivas+N+Pl+Tra: teivasteks
    teivas+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: teibaiks
    teivas+N+Pl+Trm: teivasteni
    teivas+N+Sg+Abe: teibata
    teivas+N+Sg+Abl: teibalt
    teivas+N+Sg+Ade: teibal
    teivas+N+Sg+All: teibale
    teivas+N+Sg+Com: teibaga
    teivas+N+Sg+Ela: teibast
    teivas+N+Sg+Ess: teibana
    teivas+N+Sg+Gen: teiba
    teivas+N+Sg+Ill: teibasse
    teivas+N+Sg+Ine: teibas
    teivas+N+Sg+Nom: teivas
    teivas+N+Sg+Par: teivast
    teivas+N+Sg+Tra: teibaks
    teivas+N+Sg+Trm: teibani
    teler+N+Pl+Abe: teleriteta
    teler+N+Pl+Abl: teleritelt
    teler+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: telereilt
    teler+N+Pl+Ade: teleritel
    teler+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: telereil
    teler+N+Pl+All: teleritele
    teler+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: telereile
    teler+N+Pl+Com: teleritega
    teler+N+Pl+Ela: teleritest
    teler+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: telereist
    teler+N+Pl+Ess: teleritena
    teler+N+Pl+Gen: telerite
    teler+N+Pl+Ill: teleritesse
    teler+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: telereisse
    teler+N+Pl+Ine: telerites
    teler+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: telereis
    teler+N+Pl+Nom: telerid
    teler+N+Pl+Par: telereid
    teler+N+Pl+Tra: teleriteks
    teler+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: telereiks
    teler+N+Pl+Trm: teleriteni
    teler+N+Sg+Abe: telerita
    teler+N+Sg+Abl: telerilt
    teler+N+Sg+Ade: teleril
    teler+N+Sg+All: telerile
    teler+N+Sg+Com: teleriga
    teler+N+Sg+Ela: telerist
    teler+N+Sg+Ess: telerina
    teler+N+Sg+Gen: teleri
    teler+N+Sg+Ill: telerisse
    teler+N+Sg+Ine: teleris
    teler+N+Sg+Nom: teler
    teler+N+Sg+Par: telerit
    teler+N+Sg+Tra: teleriks
    teler+N+Sg+Trm: telerini
    tiib+N+Pl+Abe: tiibadeta
    tiib+N+Pl+Abl: tiibadelt
    tiib+N+Pl+Ade: tiibadel
    tiib+N+Pl+All: tiibadele
    tiib+N+Pl+Com: tiibadega
    tiib+N+Pl+Ela: tiibadest
    tiib+N+Pl+Ess: tiibadena
    tiib+N+Pl+Gen: tiibade
    tiib+N+Pl+Ill: tiibadesse
    tiib+N+Pl+Ine: tiibades
    tiib+N+Pl+Nom: tiivad
    tiib+N+Pl+Par: tiibu
    tiib+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: tiibasid
    tiib+N+Pl+Tra: tiibadeks
    tiib+N+Pl+Trm: tiibadeni
    tiib+N+Sg+Abe: tiivata
    tiib+N+Sg+Abl: tiivalt
    tiib+N+Sg+Ade: tiival
    tiib+N+Sg+All: tiivale
    tiib+N+Sg+Com: tiivaga
    tiib+N+Sg+Ela: tiivast
    tiib+N+Sg+Ess: tiivana
    tiib+N+Sg+Gen: tiiva
    tiib+N+Sg+Ill: tiiba
    tiib+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: tiivasse
    tiib+N+Sg+Ine: tiivas
    tiib+N+Sg+Nom: tiib
    tiib+N+Sg+Par: tiiba
    tiib+N+Sg+Tra: tiivaks
    tiib+N+Sg+Trm: tiivani
    tuba+N+Pl+Abe: tubadeta
    tuba+N+Pl+Abl: tubadelt
    tuba+N+Pl+Ade: tubadel
    tuba+N+Pl+All: tubadele
    tuba+N+Pl+Com: tubadega
    tuba+N+Pl+Ela: tubadest
    tuba+N+Pl+Ess: tubadena
    tuba+N+Pl+Gen: tubade
    tuba+N+Pl+Ill: tubadesse
    tuba+N+Pl+Ine: tubades
    tuba+N+Pl+Nom: toad
    tuba+N+Pl+Par: tube
    tuba+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: tubasid
    tuba+N+Pl+Tra: tubadeks
    tuba+N+Pl+Trm: tubadeni
    tuba+N+Sg+Abe: toata
    tuba+N+Sg+Abl: toalt
    tuba+N+Sg+Ade: toal
    tuba+N+Sg+All: toale
    tuba+N+Sg+Com: toaga
    tuba+N+Sg+Ela: toast
    tuba+N+Sg+Ess: toana
    tuba+N+Sg+Gen: toa
    tuba+N+Sg+Ill: tuppa
    tuba+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: toasse
    tuba+N+Sg+Ine: toas
    tuba+N+Sg+Nom: tuba
    tuba+N+Sg+Par: tuba
    tuba+N+Sg+Tra: toaks
    tuba+N+Sg+Trm: toani
    tugi+N+Pl+Abe: tugedeta
    tugi+N+Pl+Abl: tugedelt
    tugi+N+Pl+Ade: tugedel
    tugi+N+Pl+All: tugedele
    tugi+N+Pl+Com: tugedega
    tugi+N+Pl+Ela: tugedest
    tugi+N+Pl+Ess: tugedena
    tugi+N+Pl+Gen: tugede
    tugi+N+Pl+Ill: tugedesse
    tugi+N+Pl+Ine: tugedes
    tugi+N+Pl+Nom: toed
    tugi+N+Pl+Par: tugesid
    tugi+N+Pl+Tra: tugedeks
    tugi+N+Pl+Trm: tugedeni
    tugi+N+Sg+Abe: toeta
    tugi+N+Sg+Abl: toelt
    tugi+N+Sg+Ade: toel
    tugi+N+Sg+All: toele
    tugi+N+Sg+Com: toega
    tugi+N+Sg+Ela: toest
    tugi+N+Sg+Ess: toena
    tugi+N+Sg+Gen: toe
    tugi+N+Sg+Ill: toesse
    tugi+N+Sg+Ine: toes
    tugi+N+Sg+Nom: tugi
    tugi+N+Sg+Par: tuge
    tugi+N+Sg+Tra: toeks
    tugi+N+Sg+Trm: toeni
    tõbi+N+Pl+Abe: tõbedeta
    tõbi+N+Pl+Abl: tõbedelt
    tõbi+N+Pl+Ade: tõbedel
    tõbi+N+Pl+All: tõbedele
    tõbi+N+Pl+Com: tõbedega
    tõbi+N+Pl+Ela: tõbedest
    tõbi+N+Pl+Ess: tõbedena
    tõbi+N+Pl+Gen: tõbede
    tõbi+N+Pl+Ill: tõbedesse
    tõbi+N+Pl+Ine: tõbedes
    tõbi+N+Pl+Nom: tõved
    tõbi+N+Pl+Par: tõbesid
    tõbi+N+Pl+Tra: tõbedeks
    tõbi+N+Pl+Trm: tõbedeni
    tõbi+N+Sg+Abe: tõveta
    tõbi+N+Sg+Abl: tõvelt
    tõbi+N+Sg+Ade: tõvel
    tõbi+N+Sg+All: tõvele
    tõbi+N+Sg+Com: tõvega
    tõbi+N+Sg+Ela: tõvest
    tõbi+N+Sg+Ess: tõvena
    tõbi+N+Sg+Gen: tõve
    tõbi+N+Sg+Ill: tõppe
    tõbi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: tõvesse
    tõbi+N+Sg+Ine: tõves
    tõbi+N+Sg+Nom: tõbi
    tõbi+N+Sg+Par: tõbe
    tõbi+N+Sg+Tra: tõveks
    tõbi+N+Sg+Trm: tõveni
    tõug+N+Pl+Abe: tõugudeta
    tõug+N+Pl+Abl: tõugudelt
    tõug+N+Pl+Ade: tõugudel
    tõug+N+Pl+All: tõugudele
    tõug+N+Pl+Com: tõugudega
    tõug+N+Pl+Ela: tõugudest
    tõug+N+Pl+Ess: tõugudena
    tõug+N+Pl+Gen: tõugude
    tõug+N+Pl+Ill: tõugudesse
    tõug+N+Pl+Ine: tõugudes
    tõug+N+Pl+Nom: tõud
    tõug+N+Pl+Par: tõuge
    tõug+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: tõugusid
    tõug+N+Pl+Tra: tõugudeks
    tõug+N+Pl+Trm: tõugudeni
    tõug+N+Sg+Abe: tõuta
    tõug+N+Sg+Abl: tõult
    tõug+N+Sg+Ade: tõul
    tõug+N+Sg+All: tõule
    tõug+N+Sg+Com: tõuga
    tõug+N+Sg+Ela: tõust
    tõug+N+Sg+Ess: tõuna
    tõug+N+Sg+Gen: tõu
